dictionaries/hr_HR/hr_HR.aff
FLAG long
SFX XS Y      21
SFX XS sti    dem        sti
SFX XS sti    deš        sti
SFX XS sti    de         sti
SFX XS sti    demo       sti
SFX XS sti    dete       sti
SFX XS sti    du         sti
SFX XS sti    dijah      sti
SFX XS sti    dijaše     sti
SFX XS sti    dijasmo    sti
SFX XS sti    dijaste    sti
SFX XS sti    dijahu     sti
SFX XS sti    di         sti
SFX XS sti    dimo       sti
SFX XS sti    dite       sti
SFX XS sti    o          sti
SFX XS sti    la         sti
SFX XS sti    lo         sti
SFX XS sti    li         sti
SFX XS sti    le         sti
SFX XS sti    dući       sti
SFX XS sti    st         sti

SFX XR Y      21
SFX XR psti   bem        psti
SFX XR psti   beš        psti
SFX XR psti   be         psti
SFX XR psti   bemo       psti
SFX XR psti   bete       psti
SFX XR psti   bu         psti
SFX XR psti   bijah      psti
SFX XR psti   bijaše     psti
SFX XR psti   bijasmo    psti
SFX XR psti   bijaste    psti
SFX XR psti   bijaše     psti
SFX XR psti   bi         psti
SFX XR psti   bimo       psti
SFX XR psti   bite       psti
SFX XR psti   bao        psti
SFX XR psti   bla        psti
SFX XR psti   blo        psti
SFX XR psti   bli        psti
SFX XR psti   ble        psti
SFX XR psti   bući       psti
SFX XR psti   pst        psti

SFX XQ Y      21
SFX XQ sti    tem        sti
SFX XQ sti    teš        sti
SFX XQ sti    te         sti
SFX XQ sti    temo       sti
SFX XQ sti    tete       sti
SFX XQ sti    tu         sti
SFX XQ sti    tijah      sti
SFX XQ sti    tijaše     sti
SFX XQ sti    tijasmo    sti
SFX XQ sti    tijaste    sti
SFX XQ sti    tijahu     sti
SFX XQ sti    ti         sti
SFX XQ sti    timo       sti
SFX XQ sti    tite       sti
SFX XQ sti    o          sti
SFX XQ sti    la         sti
SFX XQ sti    lo         sti
SFX XQ sti    li         sti
SFX XQ sti    le         sti
SFX XQ sti    tući       sti
SFX XQ sti    st         sti

SFX XP Y      21
SFX XP sti    stem       sti
SFX XP sti    steš       sti
SFX XP sti    ste        sti
SFX XP sti    stemo      sti
SFX XP sti    stete      sti
SFX XP sti    stu        sti
SFX XP sti    stijah     sti
SFX XP sti    stijaše    sti
SFX XP sti    stijasmo   sti
SFX XP sti    stijaste   sti
SFX XP sti    stijahu    sti
SFX XP sti    sti        sti
SFX XP sti    stimo      sti
SFX XP sti    stite      sti
SFX XP sti    stao       sti
SFX XP sti    sla        sti
SFX XP sti    slo        sti
SFX XP sti    sli        sti
SFX XP sti    sle        sti
SFX XP sti    stući      sti
SFX XP sti    st         sti

SFX XO Y      101
SFX XO sati   šem        sati
SFX XO sati   šeš        sati
SFX XO sati   še         sati
SFX XO sati   šemo       sati
SFX XO sati   šete       sati
SFX XO sati   šu         sati
SFX XO dati   đem        dati
SFX XO dati   đeš        dati
SFX XO dati   đe         dati
SFX XO dati   đemo       dati
SFX XO dati   đete       dati
SFX XO dati   đu         dati
SFX XO hati   šem        hati
SFX XO hati   šeš        hati
SFX XO hati   še         hati
SFX XO hati   šemo       hati
SFX XO hati   šete       hati
SFX XO hati   šu         hati
SFX XO cati   čem        cati
SFX XO cati   češ        cati
SFX XO cati   če         cati
SFX XO cati   čemo       cati
SFX XO cati   čete       cati
SFX XO cati   ču         cati
SFX XO kati   čem        kati
SFX XO kati   češ        kati
SFX XO kati   če         kati
SFX XO kati   čemo       kati
SFX XO kati   čete       kati
SFX XO kati   ču         kati
SFX XO zati   žem        zati
SFX XO zati   žeš        zati
SFX XO zati   že         zati
SFX XO zati   žemo       zati
SFX XO zati   žete       zati
SFX XO zati   žu         zati
SFX XO gati   žem        gati
SFX XO gati   žeš        gati
SFX XO gati   že         gati
SFX XO gati   žemo       gati
SFX XO gati   žete       gati
SFX XO gati   žu         gati
SFX XO tati   ćem        tati
SFX XO tati   ćeš        tati
SFX XO tati   će         tati
SFX XO tati   ćemo       tati
SFX XO tati   ćete       tati
SFX XO tati   ću         tati
SFX XO jati   jem        jati
SFX XO jati   ješ        jati
SFX XO jati   je         jati
SFX XO jati   jemo       jati
SFX XO jati   jete       jati
SFX XO jati   ju         jati
SFX XO ati    ah         ati
SFX XO ati    aše        ati
SFX XO ati    asmo       ati
SFX XO ati    aste       ati
SFX XO ati    ahu        ati
SFX XO sati   ši         sati
SFX XO sati   šimo       sati
SFX XO sati   šite       sati
SFX XO dati   đi         dati
SFX XO dati   đimo       dati
SFX XO dati   đite       dati
SFX XO hati   ši         hati
SFX XO hati   šimo       hati
SFX XO hati   šite       hati
SFX XO cati   či         cati
SFX XO cati   čimo       cati
SFX XO cati   čite       cati
SFX XO kati   či         kati
SFX XO kati   čimo       kati
SFX XO kati   čite       kati
SFX XO zati   ži         zati
SFX XO zati   žimo       zati
SFX XO zati   žite       zati
SFX XO gati   ži         gati
SFX XO gati   žimo       gati
SFX XO gati   žite       gati
SFX XO tati   ći         tati
SFX XO tati   ćimo       tati
SFX XO tati   ćite       tati
SFX XO jati   j          jati
SFX XO jati   jmo        jati
SFX XO jati   jte        jati
SFX XO ati    ao         ati
SFX XO ati    ala        ati
SFX XO ati    alo        ati
SFX XO ati    ali        ati
SFX XO ati    ale        ati
SFX XO sati   šući       sati
SFX XO dati   đući       dati
SFX XO hati   šući       hati
SFX XO cati   čući       cati
SFX XO kati   čući       kati
SFX XO zati   žući       zati
SFX XO gati   žući       gati
SFX XO tati   ćući       tati
SFX XO jati   jući       jati
SFX XO ati    at         ati

SFX XN Y      61
SFX XN rati   erem       rati
SFX XN rati   ereš       rati
SFX XN rati   ere        rati
SFX XN rati   eremo      rati
SFX XN rati   erete      rati
SFX XN rati   eru        rati
SFX XN ajati  ojim       ajati
SFX XN ajati  ojiš       ajati
SFX XN ajati  oji        ajati
SFX XN ajati  ojimo      ajati
SFX XN ajati  ojite      ajati
SFX XN ajati  oje        ajati
SFX XN vati   ovem       vati
SFX XN vati   oveš       vati
SFX XN vati   ove        vati
SFX XN vati   ovemo      vati
SFX XN vati   ovete      vati
SFX XN vati   ovu        vati
SFX XN skati  šćem       skati
SFX XN skati  šćeš       skati
SFX XN skati  šće        skati
SFX XN skati  šćemo      skati
SFX XN skati  šćete      skati
SFX XN skati  šću        skati
SFX XN tati   tanem      tati
SFX XN tati   taneš      tati
SFX XN tati   tane       tati
SFX XN tati   tanemo     tati
SFX XN tati   tanete     tati
SFX XN tati   tanu       tati
SFX XN ati    ah         ati
SFX XN ati    aše        ati
SFX XN ati    asmo       ati
SFX XN ati    aste       ati
SFX XN ati    ahu        ati
SFX XN rati   eri        rati
SFX XN rati   erimo      rati
SFX XN rati   erite      rati
SFX XN ajati  oj         ajati
SFX XN ajati  ojmo       ajati
SFX XN ajati  ojte       ajati
SFX XN vati   ovi        vati
SFX XN vati   ovimo      vati
SFX XN vati   ovite      vati
SFX XN skati  šći        skati
SFX XN skati  šćimo      skati
SFX XN skati  šćite      skati
SFX XN tati   tani       tati
SFX XN tati   tanimo     tati
SFX XN tati   tanite     tati
SFX XN ati    ao         ati
SFX XN ati    ala        ati
SFX XN ati    alo        ati
SFX XN ati    ali        ati
SFX XN ati    ale        ati
SFX XN rati   erući      rati
SFX XN ajati  ojeći      ajati
SFX XN vati   ovući      vati
SFX XN skati  šćući      skati
SFX XN tati   tajući     tati
SFX XN ati    at         ati

AF XZXOURUC	# 16
AF XZXNURUC	# 18
AF XS	# 77
AF XR	# 78
AF XQ	# 79
AF XP	# 80
AF XO	# 81
AF XOUR	# 84
AF XOURUD	# 85
AF XOURUC	# 86
AF XOUC	# 88
AF XN	# 89
AF XNUR	# 90
AF XNURUC	# 92
